New York, session 2025-2026, S1299.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "voter registration integrity act". 3 § 2. Section 5-210 of the election law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 5-a to read as follows: 5 5-a. In addition to documentation of New York residency, the board of 6 elections shall require that each first-time voter registration applica- 7 tion include one of the following: 8 (a) an original or certified copy of a birth certificate establishing 9 United States citizenship; 10 (b) a valid United States passport; 11 (c) a certificate of naturalization or citizenship; or 12 (d) such other documentation that the board of elections determines 13 establishes United States citizenship. 14 § 3. Clause (D) of subparagraph (viii) of paragraph (k) of subdivision 15 5 of section 5-210 of the election law, as amended by chapter 113 of the 16 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 17 (D) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government 18 check, paycheck or other government document that shows the name and 19 address of the voter; and 20 (E) in addition to documentation of New York residency, a copy of one 21 of the following: 22 (1) an original or certified copy of a birth certificate establishing 23 United States citizenship; 24 (2) a valid United States passport; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01611-01-5 S. 1299 2 1 (3) a certificate of naturalization or citizenship; or 2 (4) such other documentation that the board of elections determines 3 establishes United States citizenship. 4 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 5 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 6 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 7 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 8 on or before such effective date.